Georgia, session 2025_26, SB340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide for a new charter for the City of Tybee Island, approved April 20, 1995
(Ga. L. 1995, p. 4462), as amended, particularly by an Act approved April 2, 2019 (Ga. L.
2019, p. 3569), is amended by revising Section 2.33 as follows:
"SECTION 2.33.
Selection and powers and duties of the mayor pro tem.
At the first regular meeting of the city council following a regular election and the
assumption of office by the newly elected city council members, the city council shall
S. B. 340
- 1 -

LC 62 0163
select one of its own members as mayor pro tem. During the absence or physical or mental
disability of the mayor for any cause, the mayor pro tem, or in the mayor pro tem's absence
or disability for any reason, any one of the council members chosen by a majority vote of
the city council, shall be clothed with all the rights and privileges of the mayor and shall
perform the duties of the office of the mayor so long as such absence or disability shall
continue. Any such absence or disability shall be declared by a majority vote of all
council members. The mayor pro tem or selected council member shall sign all contracts
and ordinances in which the mayor has a disqualifying financial interest as provided in
Section 2.14 of this charter. In the event of a vacancy in the office of mayor pro tem, the
city council shall select one of its own members as mayor pro tem at the next regularly held
city council meeting following the vacancy."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 340
- 2 -